tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Titreşimli Egzersiz Makineleri: Doğrusal Titreşim Egzersiz Makineleri; Pivotal Titreşim Egzersiz Makineleri
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Vibrationstrainer: Hebende Vibrationstrainer; Kippende Vibrationstrainer
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Vibraciniai treniruokliai: Tiesiniai vibraciniai treniruokliai; Ašiniai vibraciniai treniruokliai
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Máquinas de ejercicio con vibración: Máquinas de ejercicios de vibración lineal; Máquinas de ejercicio con vibración pivotante
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Vibracijske vadbene naprave: Linearne vibracijske vadbene naprave; Središčne vibracijske vadbene naprave
en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Vibration Exercise Machines: Lineal Vibration Exercise Machines; Pivotal Vibration Exercise Machines
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Vibracijske platforme za vježbanje: Ravne vibracijske platforme za vježbanje; Vibracijske platforme za vježbanje s nagibom
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 搖擺震動機: 線性搖擺震動機; 樞軸搖擺震動機
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Vibrationsmaskiner: Vibrationsmaskiner – lineal; Vibrationsmaskiner – pivotal
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Plate-formes vibrantes: Plate-formes vibrantes linéaires; Plate-formes vibrantes pivotantes
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Vibrasjonstreningsmaskiner: Lineære vibrasjonstreningsmaskiner; Pivotale vibrasjonstreningsmaskiner
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Máquinas de exercício de vibração: Máquinas de exercício de vibração linear; Máquinas de exercício de vibração giratória
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Vibrační posilovací stroje: Vibrační posilovací stroje – lineární; Vibrační posilovací stroje – pivotové
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Μηχανήματα δόνησης για άσκηση: Γραμμικά μηχανήματα δόνησης για άσκηση; Περιστροφικά μηχανήματα δόνησης για άσκηση
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Tärinälaitteet: Lineaaliset tärinälaitteet; Pivotaaliset tärinälaitteet
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Plataformas vibratórias: Plataformas vibratórias lineares; Plataformas vibratórias pivotantes
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Treningowe urządzenia wibracyjne: Liniowe urządzenia wibracyjne; Obrotowe urządzenia wibracyjne
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 甩脂机: 直线式甩脂机; 枢轴式甩脂机
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Вибриращи платформи: Линейни вибриращи платформи; Пивотни вибриращи платформи
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Vibračné platformy: Priame vibračné platformy; Rotačné vibračné platformy
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Máy rung thể dục: Máy rung thể dục tuyến tính; Máy rung thể dục trung tâm
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Trillende fitnessapparaten: Lineaire trillende fitnessapparaten; Draaibare trillende fitnessapparaten
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Vibrációs edzőgépek: Lineális vibrációs edzőgépek; Pivotális vibrációs edzőgépek
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 振動トレーニングマシン: バイブレーター式振動エクササイズマシン; シェイカー式振動エクササイズマシン
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Виброплатформы: Статичные виброплатформы; Колеблющиеся виброплатформы
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Macchine per esercizi con vibrazione: Macchine per esercizi a vibrazione lineare; Macchine per esercizi con vibrazione fondamentale
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 진동운동기: 리니어 진동운동기; 피보털 진동운동기
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Aparate de fitness cu vibrații: Aparate de fitness cu vibrații liniare; Aparate de fitness cu vibrații cu pivotare
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Maskiner för vibrationsträning: Maskiner för linjär vibrationsträning; Maskiner för svängande vibrationsträning
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > เครื่องออกกำลังกายแบบสั่น: เครื่องออกกำลังกายแบบสั่นแบบสปริง; เครื่องออกกำลังกายแบบสั่นแบบแกน